Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 33.5
SALE OF MEAT

35-33.5-101 to 35-33.5-307. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article repealed, (HB 18-1183), ch. 60, p. 607, § 2, effective March 22.

Editor's note:

This article 33.5 was added in 2009 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 2018. For the text of this article 33.5 prior to 2018, consult the 2017 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.